District of Columbia statutes.
21-117

Additional bond.

The court may at any time require a guardian to give bond or additional bond, when the interests of the infant require it, and on his failure or refusal so to do, may revoke his appointment and appoint another guardian in his place, and require the estate of the infant to be forthwith delivered to the newly appointed guardian, and may direct the latter to bring suit upon the bond of his predecessor.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 21-117.
1973 Ed., § 21-117.